src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_pahheed_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - pahheeđ: # MLO, checked
    pahheeđ+V+Inf: pahheeđ
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pavam
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pavah
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paha # CSH
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pahheen
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pahevettee # CSH
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pahheev
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pahheep
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pahevetteđ # CSH
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: paheh # CSH
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: poohim
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: poohih
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: poovij
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: poovijm # No diff between du1 and pl1
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: poovijd # No diff between du2 and pl2
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: poovijn
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: poovijm
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: poovijd
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pohhii

    pahheeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: pavaččim
    pahheeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: pavaččih
    pahheeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: pavaččij
    pahheeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: pavaččáim
    pahheeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: pavaččáid
    pahheeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: pavaččáin
    pahheeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: pavaččijm
    pahheeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: pavaččijd
    pahheeđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: pavaččii

    pahheeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: paaveem
    pahheeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: paaveeh
    pahheeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: pooviš
    pahheeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: povižeen
    pahheeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: poovišvettee
    pahheeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: povižává
    pahheeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: povižep
    pahheeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: poovišvetteđ
    pahheeđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: povižeh
    pahheeđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: pave
    pahheeđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: pavos
    pahheeđ+V+Imprt+Du1: pahhoon
    pahheeđ+V+Imprt+Du2: pahhee
    pahheeđ+V+Imprt+Du3: pahhoos
    pahheeđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: pahhoop
    pahheeđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: pahheeđ
    pahheeđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: pahhoos
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: pave
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pahhaam

    pahheeđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: paavaa
    pahheeđ+V+PrsPrc: pahhee
    pahheeđ+V+PrfPrc: pahhaam
    pahheeđ+V+Actio+Nom: pahheem
    pahheeđ+V+Actio+Ess: pahemin
    pahheeđ+V+Actio+Loc: pahemist
    pahheeđ+V+Actio+Ill: pahemân
